West Virginia, session 2026, HB4550.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. RIGHT OF EMINENT DOMAIN. §54-1-2a. Notice; good faith purchase. Prior to initiation of any condemnation proceeding pursuant to slum and blight, the applicant must make a reasonable attempt to notify all parties subject to a petition for condemnation provided in section two of this article, and attempt to enter into negotiations for purchase of the property with the owners. The applicant shall make an offer in good faith for the purchase of the property subject to the condemnation prior to initiation of the condemnation proceeding.   The applicant shall provide their appraisal to landowners involved in eminent domain negotiations with their initial offer.